New York, session 2025-2026, A4304.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 404-ff to read as follows: 3 § 404-ff. Distinctive "I support the Seneca white deer" license 4 plates. 1. Any person residing in this state shall, upon request, be 5 issued a distinctive license plate bearing the phrase "I support the 6 Seneca white deer". Application for such license plate shall be filed 7 with the commissioner in such form and detail as the commissioner shall 8 prescribe. 9 2. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 10 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 11 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article, 12 provided, however, that an additional annual service charge of twenty- 13 five dollars shall be charged for such plate. 14 § 2. 1. A distinctive plate established pursuant to section 404-ff of 15 the vehicle and traffic law, as added by section one of this act, shall 16 only be designed, produced and issued upon the delivery to the depart- 17 ment of motor vehicles of a surety bond in the amount of six thousand 18 dollars, which shall be executed by a surety company authorized by the 19 department of financial services to transact business in this state. 20 Provided, however, that if the commissioner of motor vehicles shall have 21 received prior to plate design, production and issuance at least two 22 hundred orders for such distinctive plate together with the additional 23 annual service charge applicable to each such order, which shall be EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05962-01-5 A. 4304 2 1 non-refundable, no such surety bond shall be required. All service 2 charges collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited pursuant 3 to the provisions of section 404-oo of the vehicle and traffic law to 4 the credit of the department of motor vehicles distinctive plate devel- 5 opment fund established by section 95-g of the state finance law and 6 shall be used for the design, production, advertising and distribution 7 of distinctive license plates in accordance with such section 95-g. 8 2. If, upon the expiration of two years following the date upon which 9 distinctive plates in the series are first available for sale two 10 hundred or more sets of such plates are sold, a bond delivered pursuant 11 to this section shall be discontinued. If fewer than two hundred sets of 12 such plates are sold by such time, the department of motor vehicles 13 shall be entitled to recover against the bond in an amount proportionate 14 to such shortfall. 15 § 3. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 97-aaaa 16 to read as follows: 17 § 97-aaaa. The New York state "preserve the Seneca white deer fund". 18 1. There is hereby established in the joint custody of the commissioner 19 of environmental conservation and the comptroller, a special fund to be 20 known as the "preserve the Seneca white deer fund". 21 2. Such fund shall consist of all moneys collected pursuant to section 22 four hundred four-ff of the vehicle and traffic law, and all other 23 moneys appropriated, credited or transferred thereto from any other fund 24 or source pursuant to law. 25 3. The preserve the Seneca white deer fund shall consist of the reven- 26 ues required to be deposited therein pursuant to the provisions of 27 section four hundred four-ff of the vehicle and traffic law, and all 28 other moneys credited or transferred thereto from any other fund or 29 source pursuant to law. 30 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however that, 31 section one of this act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth 32 day after it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addi- 33 tion, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for 34 the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to 35 be made and completed on or before such effective date.